Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 19 Commission on Youth

22-19-1.
Commission created.

There is hereby created a permanent commission to represent the youth of Rhode Island, the purpose of which is to provide consultation with the legislative branch of government concerning matters of concern and interest to youth.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 454, § 1.

22-19-2.
Composition.

The composition of the commission shall be fourteen (14) members who shall be drawn from a diversity of backgrounds, ethnicity, financial positions, gender, and living area. Five (5) of the members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house, two (2), to be appointed by the house minority leader, and five (5) to be appointed by the president of the senate; and two (2) to be appointed by the senate minority leader.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 454, § 1.

22-19-3.
Charge of commission.

Issues and legislative proposals concerning youth shall be brought before and examined by the commission so that the commission may provide input and advice.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 454, § 1.